California statutes. Education Code
(c) A complainant not satisfied with the resolution of the principal or the designee of the district superintendent has the right to describe the complaint to the governing board of the school district at a regularly scheduled hearing of the governing board of the school district. As to complaints involving a condition of a facility that poses
 an emergency or urgent threat, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 17592.72, a complainant who is not satisfied with the resolution proffered by the principal or the designee of the district superintendent has the right to file an appeal to the Superintendent, who shall provide a written report to the state board describing the basis for the complaint and, as appropriate, a proposed remedy for the issue described in the complaint.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or any other law, a complaint pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) that more than one pupil does not have
 sufficient textbooks or instructional materials, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 60119, as the result of an act by the governing board of a school district, or the governing board’s failure to act to remedy the deficiency, may be filed with the Superintendent directly. In responding to such a complaint, the Superintendent may directly intervene without waiting for an investigation under subdivisions (a), (b), and (c). A complaint filed pursuant to this subdivision shall identify the basis for filing the complaint directly with the Superintendent. The complainant shall present the Superintendent with evidence that supports the basis for the direct filing.

(e) A school district shall report summarized data on the nature and resolution of all complaints on a quarterly basis to the county superintendent of schools and the governing board of the school district. The summaries shall be publicly reported on a quarterly basis at a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing board of
 the school district. The report shall include the number of complaints by general subject area with the number of resolved and unresolved complaints. The complaints and written responses shall be available as public records.

(f) The procedure required pursuant to this section is intended to address all of the following:

(1) A complaint related to instructional materials as follows:

(A) A pupil, including an English learner, does not have standards-aligned textbooks or instructional materials or state-adopted or district-adopted textbooks or other required instructional material to use in class.

(B) A pupil does not have access to instructional
 materials to use at home or after school.

(C) Textbooks or instructional materials are in poor or unusable condition, have missing pages, or are unreadable due to damage.

(2) A complaint related to teacher vacancy or misassignment as follows:

(A) A semester begins and a teacher vacancy exists.

(B) A teacher who lacks credentials or training to teach English learners is assigned to teach a class with one or more English learner pupils in the class. This subparagraph does not relieve a school district from complying with state or federal law regarding teachers of English learners.

(C) A
 teacher is assigned to teach a class for which the teacher lacks subject matter competency.

(3) A complaint related to the condition of facilities that pose an emergency or urgent threat to the health or safety of pupils or staff as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 17592.72 and any other emergency conditions the school district determines appropriate and the requirements established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 35292.5.

(g) In order to identify appropriate subjects of complaint, a notice shall be posted in each classroom in each school in the school district notifying parents, guardians, pupils, and teachers of the following:

(1) There should be sufficient textbooks and instructional materials.
 For there to be sufficient textbooks and instructional materials each pupil, including English learners, must have a textbook or instructional materials, or both, to use in class and to take home.

(2) School facilities must be clean, safe, and maintained in good repair.

(3) There should be no teacher vacancies or misassignments as defined in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (i).

(4) The location at which to obtain a form to file a complaint in case of a shortage. Posting a notice downloadable from the internet website of the department shall satisfy this requirement.

(h) A local educational agency shall establish local policies and procedures, post
 notices, and implement this section.

(i) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Good repair” has the same meaning as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 17002.

(2) “Misassignment” means the placement of a certificated employee in a teaching or services position for which the employee does not hold a legally recognized certificate or credential or the placement of a certificated employee in a teaching or services position that the employee is not otherwise authorized by statute to hold.

(3) “Teacher vacancy” means a position to which a single designated certificated employee has not been assigned at the beginning of the
 year for an entire year or, if the position is for a one-semester course, a position to which a single designated certificated employee has not been assigned at the beginning of a semester for an entire semester.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 229, Sec. 6.   (AB 1078)   Effective September 25, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Instructions From Electors [35190. - 35192.]

35190.

The governing board of a school district, except a district having a city board of education, may, and upon a petition signed by a majority of the electors resident in the district shall, call meetings of the qualified electors of the district for consultation in regard to any affairs in the district. A meeting so called shall be competent to instruct the governing board, and the board shall, in all cases, be bound by such instructions upon the following subjects:

(a) The location or change of location of the schoolhouse, if the proposal to instruct the board in regard to changing the location of the schoolhouse is passed by a vote of two-thirds of all the electors voting at the meeting upon the proposition.

(b) The use of the schoolhouse for other than school purposes, but in no case shall the schoolhouse be used for purposes which necessitate the removal of any school desks or other school furniture.

(c) The sale and purchase of school sites.

(d) The prosecution, settlement, or compromise of any litigation in which the district is engaged, or is likely to become engaged.

The meeting may vote money not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) in any one year, for any of these purposes in addition to any amount which may be raised by the sale of district school property, and the insurance of property destroyed by fire, except that the proceeds of the insurance of the library and apparatus shall be paid into the library fund. All funds raised by the sale of school property may be disposed of by direction of a district meeting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35191.

The meeting provided for in Section 35190 shall be called by posting three notices in public places, one of which shall be in a conspicuous place on the schoolhouse, for not less than 10 days prior to the time for which the meeting is called. The notices shall specify the purposes for which the meeting is called, and no other business shall be transacted at the meeting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35192.

Any district meeting called pursuant to Sections 35190 and 35191 shall be organized by choosing a chairman from the electors present. The district clerk or secretary shall be clerk of the meeting, and shall enter the minutes on the records of the district. Any district meeting may be adjourned from time to time as found necessary. All votes instructing the board of trustees shall be taken by ballot, or by “ayes” and “noes” vote as the meeting may determine.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Liabilities [35200. - 35214.]

35200.

The governing board of any school district is liable as such in the name of the district for all debts and contracts, including the salary due any teacher, not made in excess of the school moneys accruing to the district and usable for the purposes of the debts and contracts during the school year for which the debts and contracts are made. The district shall not be liable for debts and contracts made in violation of this section.

For the purposes of this section, moneys transferred to the funds of a newly organized school district pursuant to Section 42623 are deemed school moneys accruing to the district and usable for the purposes of contracts made for the school year preceding the date the district became effective for all purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35202.

All claims for money or damages against a school district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35204.

The governing board of any school district, may contract for the services of an attorney in private practice, as an employee or independent contractor, or utilize an administrative adviser for whatever purpose the governing board deems appropriate, and compensation of this attorney pursuant to contract shall be a proper use of school district funds. For purposes of this section, “an attorney in private practice” includes a sole practitioner, partnership, or professional corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 696, Sec. 7.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

35205.

The governing board of any school district may contract with a qualified attorney in private practice to provide legal services and compensation of this attorney in private practice pursuant to contract under this section shall be a proper use of school district funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 696, Sec. 8.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

35207.

The governing board of any school district, may contract for the services of a hearing officer pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 27720), Part 3, Division 2, Title 3 of the Government Code and, for purposes of that chapter, the governing board is deemed to be a local body and the school district a local public entity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35208.

(a) The governing board of any school district shall insure against: 

(1) The liability, other than a liability which may be insured against under the provisions of Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code, of the district for damages for death, injury to person, or damage or loss of property; and

(2) The personal liability of the members of the board and of the officers and employees of the district for damages for death, injury to a person, or damage or loss of property caused by the negligent act or omission of the member, officer or employee when acting within the scope of his office or employment.

(b) The insurance may be written in any insurance company authorized to transact the business of insurance in the state, or in a nonadmitted insurer to the extent and subject to the conditions prescribed by Section 1763 of the Insurance Code.

(c) Nothing in this section is intended to limit or restrict the authority of the district to insure under Part 6 (commencing with Section 989) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35211.

The governing board of any school district maintaining a course of automobile driver training shall advise the parents or guardians or persons having custody of pupils of the district participating in automobile driver training courses under the jurisdiction of, or sponsored or controlled by, the district, who have signed the statement required by Section 12650 of the Vehicle Code or an application for a driver’s license under Section 17701 of the Vehicle Code, of each of the following:

(a) Any civil liability of the minor which will be imposed on the parent, guardian, or other person by reason of such minor operating a motor vehicle.

(b) The insurance coverage carried by the school district, with respect to the use of motor vehicles in connection with such courses, specifically including any limitations of such coverage which limit such coverage to an amount less than the liability imposed on the parent, guardian, or other person, or which limit the nature of such coverage to exclude any activity or situation included within the liability so imposed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35213.

The governing body of a school district may provide by rule or regulation for the reimbursement of any person or persons for the loss, destruction, or damage by arson, burglary or vandalism of personal property used in the schools of the district. Reimbursement shall be made only when approval for the use of the personal property in the schools was given before the property was brought to school and when the value of the property was agreed upon by the person or persons bringing the property and the school administrator or person appointed by him for this purpose at the time the approval for its use was given. The governing body may establish a maximum value of reimbursement which will be paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35214.

The board of governors of a school district may provide protection from its own funds for the purpose of covering the liability of the district, its officers, agents, and employees, in lieu of carrying insurance in insurance companies as provided in Section 35208. Nothing contained herein shall be construed as prohibiting the board of education of the district from providing protection against such liability partly by means of its own funds and partly by means of insurance written by insurance companies as provided in Section 35208.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Training [35220. - 35223.]

35220.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Entity managing a charter school” means a nonprofit public benefit corporation operating a charter school consistent with Section 47604.

 (b) “K–12 public education school finance laws” includes both of the following:

(1) Laws related to the creation and approval of a local educational agency budget to support pupil learning and achievement, including, but not limited to, Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 42100) of Part 24.

(2) Laws related to fiscal penalties for noncompliance, including, but not limited to, those in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 42238) of Part 24, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 46100) of Part 26 of Division 4, including Sections 46207 and 46208, Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 47600) of Part 26.8 of Division 4, Sections 45037, 47612.5, 51745.6, 51749.5, and 60150, and Section 11960 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(d) (1) “Local educational agency official” means either of the following:

(A) Any regular member of the governing board of a school district or of a county board of education.

(B) Any regular member of the governing body of a charter school or of an entity managing a charter school.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), “regular member” has the same meaning as in Section 1000, 35012, or 47604.2 that is applicable to a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 618, Sec. 1.   (AB 640)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

35220.5.

(a) (1) The County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team established pursuant to Section 42127.8 shall, in consultation with the department, develop, on or before October 1, 2026, a curriculum for the topics described in subdivision (b) of Section 35220 that shall be used to satisfy the requirement of subdivision (a) of Section 35221. The curriculum shall be posted on the internet websites of the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team and the department.

(2) In developing the curriculum pursuant to paragraph (1),
 the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team shall solicit input from experts in the topics described in subdivision (b) of Section 35220 and the public.

(b) The curriculum developed pursuant to
 subdivision (a) shall be updated periodically to reflect statutory changes to the laws described in subdivision (b) of Section 35220.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 618, Sec. 1.   (AB 640)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

35221.

(a) Each local educational agency official shall receive training in K–12 public education school finance laws pursuant to this article.

(b) An entity offering training courses to meet the requirements of this article shall use the curriculum
 developed pursuant to Section 35220.5.

(c) (1) In order to meet the requirement of subdivision (a), a local educational agency or a consortium of local educational agencies shall only use the following methods:

(A) Offer training courses using local educational agency employees or contracted legal counsel with demonstrable experience in the applicable topic described in subdivision (b) of Section 35220 for which it will provide training.

(B) (i) Arrange for its
 local educational agency officials to receive training courses through an entity that meets all of the following requirements:

(I) One of the entity’s primary functions is supporting local educational agencies with technical assistance and expertise in the applicable topic described in subdivision (b) of Section 35220 for which it will provide training.

(II) The entity has demonstrable experience supporting local educational agencies with technical assistance and expertise.

(III) The entity has trainers that each possess demonstrable experience
 in the applicable topic described in
 subdivision (b) of Section 35220 for which it will provide training.

(ii) (I) Local educational agency officials of school districts and county offices of education shall only receive training from an entity described in clause (i) with demonstrable experience supporting school districts and county offices of education with technical assistance and expertise, or as provided by subparagraph (A) (C), or (D).

(II) Local educational agency officials of charter schools or an entity managing charter schools shall only receive training from an entity with demonstrable
 experience supporting charter schools with technical assistance and expertise, or as provided by subparagraph (A) (C), or (D).

(C) Arrange for its local educational agency officials to receive training courses through the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team established pursuant to Section 42127.8. The County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team may charge a fee to local educational agencies for providing the training.

(D) Arrange for its local educational agency officials to receive training courses through a nonprofit statewide education association led by officials who govern school districts and county offices of education.

(E) Offer their own, or arrange through a different entity that meets the requirements of subparagraph (B)
 (C), or (D), sets of self-study materials with tests.

(2) Courses offered or arranged pursuant to subparagraph (A), (B), (C), or (D) of paragraph (1), as applicable, may be taken at home, in person, or online.

(d) A local educational agency official that has successfully completed the California School Boards Association’s Masters in Governance program and provides their local educational agency with proof of their participation and completion of the program, to comply with Section 35222, shall be exempt from the requirement of subdivision (a).

(e) A training course covering the topics described in
 subdivision (b) of Section 35220 shall be no longer than four hours.

(f) A provider of a training course that meets the requirements of this article shall provide participants with proof of participation to comply with Section 35222.

(g) A local educational agency shall provide information to its officials at least annually on training available to meet the
 requirements of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 618, Sec. 1.   (AB 640)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

35222.

(a) A local educational agency shall maintain records showing both of the following:

(1) The dates on which each local educational agency official satisfied the requirements of this article.

(2) The entity that provided the training to the local educational agency official.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a local educational agency shall maintain the records required by this section for at least five years after a local educational agency official receives the training. These records are public records subject to disclosure under the California
 Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 618, Sec. 1.   (AB 640)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

35223.

(a) Each local educational agency official in local educational agency service as of April 1, 2027, except for officials whose term of office ends before April 1, 2028, shall receive the training required by subdivision (a) of Section 35221 before April 1, 2028.

(b) Each local educational agency official who commences
 their initial service, or who commences a subsequent nonconsecutive term, with a local educational agency on or after April 1, 2027, shall receive the training required by subdivision (a) of Section 35221 no later than one year from the first day of their initial service, or of their subsequent nonconsecutive term, as applicable, with the local educational agency. Each local educational agency official described in this subdivision is encouraged to begin the training required by subdivision (a) of Section 35221 before the first meeting of the governing board or body that occurs after the election or appointment of the official.

(c) For purposes of this article, a local educational agency official who received training pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) during their initial term, and who then serves one or more consecutive
 terms, shall be deemed to have complied with the requirements of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 618, Sec. 1.   (AB 640)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Corrupt Practices [35230. - 35240.]

35230.

The offering of any valuable thing to any member of the governing board of any school district, with the intent to influence his action in regard to the granting of any teacher’s certificate, the appointment of any teacher, superintendent, or other officer or employee, the adoption of any textbook, or the making of any contract to which the board of which he is a member is a party, or the acceptance by any member of the governing board of any valuable thing, with corrupt intent, is a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35231.

Any contract or appointment obtained from the governing board of any school district by corrupt means is void.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35232.

Any person may be compelled to testify in any lawful investigation or judicial proceeding against any person who is charged with any offense described in Sections 35230 or 35231.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35233.

The prohibitions contained in Article 4 (commencing with Section 1090) and Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 1125) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code are applicable to members of governing boards of school districts and to members of citizens’ oversight committees appointed by those governing boards pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 15264) of Part 10.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 44, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

35239.

(a) In a school district which during the preceding fiscal year had an average daily attendance of 70 or less, a member of the governing board may receive a reasonable compensation from the district for necessary work and labor performed by him or her for the district in repairing the schoolhouse, fences, and other property belonging to the district, or in furnishing wood or other necessary supplies.

(b) In a school district which during the preceding fiscal year had an average daily attendance of 70 or less, a member of the governing board may receive a reasonable compensation from the district for providing services in a classified position if the collective bargaining agent for classified employees in that district and the governing board concur that no other qualified person is available.

(c) The requisition drawn pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) for payment for services or supplies shall be signed by the other members of the governing board and shall be subject to approval by the county superintendent of schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 56, Sec. 39.)
-------------------------------------------

35240.

Any contract made in violation of Section 35239 is void.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 816, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Records and Reports [35250. - 35258.]

35250.

The governing board of every school district shall:

(a) Certify or attest to actions taken by the governing board whenever such certification or attestation is required for any purpose.

(b) Keep an accurate account of the receipts and expenditures of school moneys.

(c) Make an annual report, on or before the first day of July, to the county superintendent of schools in the manner and form and on the blanks prescribed by the Superintendent of
 Public Instruction.

(d) Make or maintain such other records or reports as are required by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35251.

Whenever in any school year the school register of any teacher, or other records of any school district are destroyed by conflagration or public calamity, preventing the teacher and school officers from making their annual reports in the usual manner and with accuracy, affidavits of the teacher, the school principals, or other officers of the school district, certifying as to the contents of the destroyed register or other records, shall be accepted by all school authorities for all school purposes appertaining to the school district, except that of average daily attendance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35252.

Whenever the average daily attendance of any school district has been materially affected in any school year by conflagration, public calamity, or epidemic of unusual duration and prevalence, the regular annual reports of the teacher, the school principal, or officers of the school district, shall be accepted by all school officers for all school matters appertaining to the school district, except that of average daily attendance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35253.

Whenever the destruction of records of a school district is not otherwise authorized or provided for by law, the governing board of the district may destroy those records of the school district in accordance with regulations of the Superintendent that the Superintendent may by this provision adopt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 25.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

35254.

The governing board of any school district may make photographic, microfilm, or electronic copies of any records of the district. The original of any records of which a photographic, microfilm, or electronic copy has been made may be destroyed when provision is made for permanently maintaining the photographic, microfilm or electronic copies in the files of the district, except that no original record that is basic to any required audit shall be destroyed prior to the second July 1st succeeding the completion of the audit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

35255.

In any joint school district, all returns, reports, certificates, estimates, petitions, and other papers of any kind relating to schools and school districts, required by law to be filed with or presented to the board of supervisors or county superintendent of schools, shall be filed with or presented to the supervisors or superintendent of schools of each county in which any portion of the district is situated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35256.

School Accountability Report Card

The governing board of each school district maintaining an elementary or secondary school shall develop and cause to be implemented for each school in the school district a School Accountability Report Card.

(a) The School Accountability Report Card shall include, but is not limited to, the conditions listed in Section 33126.

(b) Not less than triennially, the governing board of each school district shall compare the content of the School Accountability Report Card of the school district to the model School Accountability Report Card adopted by the state board. Variances among school districts shall be permitted where necessary to account for local needs.

(c) The governing board of each school district annually shall issue a School Accountability Report Card for each school in the school district, publicize those reports, and notify parents or guardians of pupils that a hard copy will be provided upon request. Commencing with the 2008–09 school year, each school district shall make hard copies of its annually updated report card available, upon request, on or before February 1 of each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 530, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 1988, by initiative Prop. 98.)
-------------------------------------------

35256.1.

In addition to the information required under Section 35256, each School Accountability Report Card shall include the information required under Section 41409.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1463, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35258.

(a) Each school district that is connected to the Internet shall make the information contained in the School Accountability Report Card developed pursuant to Section 35256 accessible on the Internet. The School Accountability Report Card information shall be updated annually. Commencing with the 2008–09 school year, each school district connected to the Internet shall make its annually updated report card available on the Internet on or before February 1 of each year.

(b) Commencing with the 2008–09 school year, each school district not connected to the Internet shall make hard copies of its annually updated School Accountability Report Card available, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 35256, on or before February 1 of each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 530, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.5. Cybersecurity [35265. - 35267.]

35265.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “California Cybersecurity Integration Center” or “Center” means the California Cybersecurity Integration Center established by the Office of Emergency Services pursuant to Section 8586.5 of the Government Code.

(b) “Cyberattack” means either of the following:

(1) Any alteration, deletion, damage, or destruction of a computer system, computer network, computer program, or data caused by unauthorized access.

(2) The unauthorized denial of access to legitimate users of a computer system, computer network,
 computer program, or data.

(c) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 498, Sec. 1.   (AB 2355)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 35267.)
-------------------------------------------

35266.

(a) A local educational agency shall report any cyberattack impacting more than 500 pupils or personnel to the California Cybersecurity Integration Center.

(b) (1) The California Cybersecurity Integration Center shall establish a database that tracks reports of cyberattacks submitted by local educational agencies pursuant to this section. The Center shall annually, by January 1, provide a report to the Governor and the relevant policy committees of the Legislature summarizing the types and number of cyberattacks on local educational agencies, the types and number of data breaches affecting local educational agencies that have been reported to the Attorney General pursuant to Sections 1798.29 and 1798.82 of the Civil Code,
 any activities provided by the Center to prevent cyberattacks or data breaches of a local educational agency, and support provided by the Center following a cyberattack or data breach of a local educational agency.

(2) The Attorney General shall share sample copies of data breach notifications received from local educational agencies pursuant to Sections 1798.29 and 1798.82 of the Civil Code, excluding any personally identifiable information, with the Center for the purpose of compiling this report.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect any disclosure or notification requirements pursuant to Sections 1798.29 and 1798.82 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 498, Sec. 1.   (AB 2355)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 35267.)
-------------------------------------------

35267.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 498, Sec. 1.   (AB 2355)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 8.5, commencing with Section 35265.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Property [35270.5. - 35275.]

35270.5.

The governing board of any school district may acquire by eminent domain any property necessary to carry out any of the powers or functions of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35271.

(a) The governing board of any school district may acquire property, construct buildings, and maintain classes outside its boundaries on sites immediately adjacent to school sites of the district within its boundaries.

(b) This section shall become operative June 30, 1993.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 135, Sec. 2.   Effective July 13, 1989.   Section operative June 30, 1993, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

35272.

The governing board of any school district may acquire and pay for educational and athletic equipment, supplies and materials, and other personal property necessary to its operation of the schools, as provided by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35275.

The governing board of any school district shall meet with appropriate local government recreation and park authorities to review all possible methods of coordinating planning, design, and construction of new school facilities and schoolsites or major additions to existing school facilities and recreation and park facilities in the community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 840, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.5. Schoolsite Replacement Housing [35277. - 35278.5.]

35277.

For purposes of this article the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Affordable housing cost” has the same meaning as set forth in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 50050) of Part 1 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code as applied to persons and families of low or moderate income.

(b) “Affordable rent” has the same meaning as set forth in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 50050) of Part 1 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code as applied to persons and families of low or moderate income.

(c) “Extremely low income households” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 50106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) “Local governing agency” means a city in which a new schoolsite is located, or if a new schoolsite is located in an unincorporated area, the county in which the new schoolsite is located.

(e) “Eligible nonprofit corporation” means a nonprofit public benefit corporation, nonprofit mutual benefit corporation, or a limited liability company in which the managing member is a nonprofit public benefit corporation or a nonprofit mutual benefit corporation.

(f) “New schoolsite” means real property acquired by a school district on and after January 1, 2003, for construction of a new schoolsite or for expansion of an existing schoolsite.

(g) “New schoolsite replacement housing” means housing to replace the residential dwelling units demolished or to be demolished in connection with a new schoolsite.

(h) “Persons and families of low income” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.

(i) “Persons and families of low or moderate income” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.

(j) “Very low income households” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 50105 of the Health and Safety Code.

(k) “Vicinity of a new schoolsite” means the area within the census tract in which a new schoolsite is located and the areas within the immediately adjacent census tracts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 495, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

35277.5.

For purposes of this article, an extreme shortage of affordable housing exists if any of the following conditions exist:

(a) The vacancy rate for rental housing in the jurisdiction in which the new schoolsite is located is 5 percent or lower.

(b) The median rent in the Zip Code where the new replacement housing is located is more than 30 percent of the median income of the households displaced by the school construction.
